Utah statutes.
62A-15-605.    Forensic Mental Health Coordinating Council -- Establishment
and purpose.
(1)  There is established the Forensic Mental Health Coordinating Council
composed of the following members:
(a)  the director or the director's appointee;
(b)  the superintendent of the state hospital or the superintendent's
appointee;
(c)  the executive director of the Department of Corrections or the executive
director's appointee;
(d)  a member of the Board of Pardons and Parole or its appointee;
(e)  the attorney general or the attorney general's appointee;
(f)  the director of the Division of Services for People with Disabilities or
the director's appointee;
(g)  the director of the Division of Juvenile Justice Services or the
director's appointee;
(h)  the director of the Commission on Criminal and Juvenile Justice or the
director's appointee;
(i)  the state court administrator or the administrator's appointee;
(j)  the state juvenile court administrator or the administrator's appointee;
(k)  a representative from a local mental health authority or an organization,
excluding the state hospital that provides mental health services under
contract with the Division of Substance Abuse and Mental Health or a local
mental health authority, as appointed by the director of the division;
(l)  the executive director of the Governor's Council for People with
Disabilities or the director's appointee; and
(m)  other persons as appointed by the members described in Subsections (1)(a)
through (l).
(2)  A member may not receive compensation or benefits for the member's
service, but may receive per diem and travel expenses in accordance with:
(a)  Section 63A-3-106;
(b)  Section 63A-3-107; and
(c)  rules made by the Division of Finance pursuant to Sections 63A-3-106 and
63A-3-107.
(3)  The purpose of the Forensic Mental Health Coordinating Council is to:
(a)  advise the director regarding admissions to the state hospital of persons
in the custody of the Department of Corrections;
(b)  develop policies for coordination between the division and the Department
of Corrections;
(c)  advise the executive director of the Department of Corrections regarding
issues of care for persons in the custody of the Department of Corrections who
are mentally ill;
(d)  promote communication between and coordination among all agencies dealing
with persons with mental retardation, as defined in Section 62A-5-101, or
mental illness who become involved in the civil commitment system or in the
criminal or juvenile justice system;
(e)  study, evaluate, and recommend changes to laws and procedures relating to
persons with mental retardation or mental illness who become involved in the
civil commitment system or in the criminal or juvenile justice system;
(f)  identify and promote the implementation of specific policies and programs
to deal fairly and efficiently with persons with mental retardation or mental
illness who become involved in the civil commitment system or in the criminal
or juvenile justice system; and
(g)  promote judicial education relating to persons with mental retardation or
mental illness who become involved in the civil commitment system or in the
criminal or juvenile justice system.
